Connecticut, session 2026, SB00301.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Department of Banking shall
2 conduct a study to assess (1) the availability of signature guarantee
3 programs, as defined in 31 CFR 306.2, as amended from time to time, at
4 financial institutions in the state, and (2) any issues relating to the ability
5 of consumers to access such programs in order to obtain a guarantee, as
6 defined in 17 CFR 240.17Ad-15, as amended from time to time. Not later
7 than January 1, 2027, the department shall submit a report, in
8 accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
9 concerning the results of such study to the joint standing committee of
10 the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to banking.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
SB301 / File No. 80 1

SB301 File No. 80
Section 1 from passage New section
BA Joint Favorable
SB301 / File No. 80 2

SB301 File No. 80
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires the Department of Banking to conduct a
study relating to signature guarantee programs, results in no fiscal
impact since the department has the capabilities to meet the
requirements of the bill.
SB301 / File No. 80 3

SB301 File No. 80
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 301
AN ACT REQUIRING THE DEPARTMENT OF BANKING TO
CONDUCT A STUDY RELATING TO SIGNATURE GUARANTEE
PROGRAMS.